District of Columbia statutes.
42-807

Limitations upon right of redemption in §§ 42-805 and 42-806.

Sections 42-805 and 42-806 or anything therein contained, shall not extend to any case where the person or persons, against whom the redemption is or shall be prayed, shall (by writing under his, her, or their hands, or the hand of his, her, or their attorney, agent, or solicitor, to be delivered before the money shall be brought into such court at law, to the attorney or solicitor for the other side) insist, either that the party praying a redemption has not a right to redeem, or that the premises are chargeable with other or different principal sums, than what appear on the face of the mortgage, or shall be admitted on the other side; nor to any case where the right of redemption to the mortgaged lands and premises in question in any cause or suit shall be controverted or questioned by or between different defendants in the same cause or suit; nor shall be any prejudice to any subsequent mortgagee or mortgagees, or subsequent encumbrancer.

History

7 Geo. 2, ch. 20, § 3, 1734
Kilty’s Rep. 251
Alex. Br. Stat. 728
Comp. Stat., D.C., p. 397, § 3
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601, 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(b), 49 DCR 2551

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-707.
1973 Ed., § 45-607.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-132 revived this section as of November 6, 2001. This section had been previously repealed by D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).

Emergency Legislation

Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) revival of section, see § 403(b) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).